Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB286.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 85 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER GSENIOR CITIZEN PROPERTY TAX FREEZESec.8591. Scope of subchapter.8592. Definitions.8593. Authority.8594. Income eligibility.8595. Tax freeze.8596. Application procedure.8597. Program performance and annual report.1234567891011121314151617 8598. Report.§ 8591. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to senior citizen property tax freeze.§ 8592. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Base payment." The amount of property tax paid by an applicant in the base year."Base year." The tax year preceding the first tax year for which a taxing authority implements the provisions of this subchapter or the tax year immediately preceding an applicant's approval for a tax freeze under section 8595 (relating to tax freeze)."Claimant." A person who has owned and lived in their home for at least 10 years and meets one of the following requirements:(1) is at least 65 years of age or whose spouse, if a member of the household, is at least 65 years of age;(2) is a widow or widower at least 50 years of age; or(3) is a permanently disabled person at least 18 years of age."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Household income." All income as defined in section 1303 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, received by the claimant and by the claimant's spouse during the calendar year for which a tax deferral is claimed.§ 8593. Authority.20250HB0286PN0231 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 All political subdivisions shall have the power and authority to grant annual tax freezes in the manner provided in this subchapter.§ 8594. Income eligibility.A claimant shall be eligible for a tax freeze under this subchapter if the claimant and the claimant's spouse, if a member of the household, have a household income not exceeding $45,000 annually.§ 8595. Tax freeze.A claimant shall have real property taxes frozen at the claimant's base year amount for as long as the claimant remains eligible under this subchapter.§ 8596. Application procedure.(a) Initial application.--A person eligible for a tax freeze under this subchapter may apply annually to a political subdivision. In the initial year of application, the following information shall be provided in the application provided under subsection (b):(1) A certification that the applicant or the applicant's spouse jointly are the owners in fee simple of the homestead upon which the real property taxes are imposed.(2) Receipts showing timely payment of the immediately preceding year's base payment of real property taxes.(3) Proof of income eligibility under section 8594 (relating to income eligibility).(4) Other information required by the political subdivision for the purpose of complying with section 8597(c) (relating to program performance and annual report).(b) Application form.--The department shall develop a standardized application form for use by political subdivisions 20250HB0286PN0231 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in accordance with the following:(1) The application form shall be substantially similar to the application form for property tax or rent rebate claims under Chapter 13 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act.(2) The department shall transmit the application form to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and transmit the application to political subdivisions upon request.(3) The department may post the application on a publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Subsequent years.--After the political subdivision authorizes a claimant's initial application, the claimant shall remain eligible for a tax freeze in subsequent years so long as the claimant annually refiles the application with the political subdivision showing that the claimant continues to meet the eligibility requirements of this subchapter.§ 8597. Program performance and annual report.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall:(1) Compile a list of political subdivisions that grant a tax freeze under this subchapter.(2) Compile the aggregate number of individuals granted a tax freeze in each political subdivision that grants a tax freeze under this subchapter.(3) Calculate the difference between the total amount of real property taxes payable by the individuals granted a tax freeze under this subchapter and the total amount of real property taxes that would have been payable by those individuals but for the tax freeze.20250HB0286PN0231 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Publish an annual report with the information under paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) and post the annual report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Costs.--The department shall collect the information under subsection (a) in a manner to minimize the costs and administrative requirements on political subdivisions.(c) Duties of political subdivisions.--(1) A political subdivision that has granted a tax freeze under this subchapter shall notify the department in writing and assist the department in compiling the information under subsection (a).(2) The reporting requirements under this subsection may be submitted electronically to the department.§ 8598. Report.The department shall submit a report with the information under section 8597(a)(1), (2) and (3) (relating to program performance and annual report) and any other relevant information to the General Assembly before December 31, 2030, for the purpose of reviewing the eligibility criteria and effectiveness of the tax freeze under this subchapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0286PN0231 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021